Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-219
Drains or ditches; appraisers; compensation; expenses.

The appraisers shall receive the sum of three dollars per day for the time necessarily employed, together with necessary traveling expenses, with reimbursement for mileage to be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176, to be taxed as costs and to be paid from the money received from said special assessments as provided in section 31-211.

Laws 1911, c. 142, § 14, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 1789;

C.S.1922, § 1736;

C.S.1929, § 31-319;

R.S.1943, § 31-219;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 46;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 19.